Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 15 Flags and Emblems

11-15-1.
Definition of terms.

“Flag,” “standard,” “color,” or “ensign,” as used in §§

11-15-1

— 11-15-3, includes any flag, standard, color, ensign, or any picture or representation of either of them, made of any substance, or represented on any substance, and of any size, evidently purporting to be either of the flag, standard, color, or ensign of the United States of America, or a picture or a representation of either of them, upon which shall be shown the colors, the stars, and the stripes, in any number of either of them, or by which the person seeing the picture or representation, without deliberation, may believe it to represent the flag, colors, standards, or ensign of the United States of America.

History of Section.

P.L. 1902, ch. 986, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, § 40; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 40; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 39; G.L. 1956, §

11-15-1

.

11-15-2, 11-15-3.
Repealed.

11-15-4.
Use of state emblems for commercial purposes.

No person, firm or corporation shall use the state seal, the state coat of arms, or a facsimile or imitation of them, for commercial purposes. The use of the state seal, the state coat of arms, or a facsimile or imitation of them as a portion of any letterhead, or in any advertisement, shall create a presumption that the use is for commercial purposes. Any person who violates any provisions of this section shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1703, §§ 1, 2; G.L. 1956, §

11-15-4

.

11-15-4.1.
Unauthorized use of the emblem of the attorney general.

No person, firm or corporation shall use, without authorization, the emblem of the department of the attorney general that is authorized by the attorney general or any such emblem used to imitate an emblem of the department of the attorney general, for any fraudulent purpose, or for any purpose intended to deceive, harm, or defraud any person. Any person who violates any provisions of this section shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, is subject to imprisonment for up to one year, a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 327, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 392, § 2.

11-15-5.
Injunctive relief.

The attorney general of the state of Rhode Island shall, upon the submission of proof of any violation of the provisions of §

11-15-4

, seek injunctive relief against further violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1703, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

11-15-5

.

11-15-6.
Repealed.

11-15-7.
Display of foreign flags on public buildings.

It shall be unlawful to display the flag or emblem of any foreign country upon the flagstaff of any state, county, city or town building or public schoolhouse within this state; provided, that when any foreigner shall become the guest of the United States, or of this state, the flag of the country of which the public guest shall be a citizen or subject may be displayed upon public buildings, except public schoolhouses. Every person who shall violate the provisions of this section shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 283, § 29; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, § 38; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 38; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 37; G.L. 1956, §

11-15-7

.